California, session 20252026, AB1654.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 15250.2 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:15250.2. (a) (1) Before issuing or renewing any commercial driver’s license, the department shall verify the applicant’s lawful presence in the United States through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements (SAVE) Program or any successor program administered by the United States Department of Homeland Security.(2) If the department is unable to confirm lawful presence, the application shall be denied.(b) The department shall revoke any commercial driver’s license issued to a person subsequently determined to be unlawfully present in the United States, following notice and an opportunity to be heard consistent with Article 3 (commencing with Section 14100) of Chapter 3.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with or preempt federal law or regulation, including the issuance of temporary commercial driver’s licenses to lawfully present nondomiciled individuals authorized under federal law.